Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
23G

OFFICE OF
THE LEGISLATIVE REFERENCE BUREAU

Part I. Office Generally

Section

23G-1 Legislative reference bureau; director,
appointment,

tenure, removal, compensation, vacancy

23G-2 Assistant; staff

23G-3 General purposes of bureau

23G-4 Prohibitions

23G-5 Annual and other reports to be submitted
to

legislature; tracking, monitoring,
reporting,

coordination

Part II. Statute Revision and Publication

23G-11 Revisor of statutes

23G-12 Duties

23G-13 Publishing of session laws

23G-14 Publication of supplements

23G-15 Supplements and replacement volumes;
extent of

revision; prima facie the law

23G-16 Publication of replacement volumes

23G-16.5 Printing of acts to be included in
publications

23G-17 Printing; contracts

23G-18 Sale and distribution

23G-19 Review of annotations

23G-20 Continuous statutory revision

Cross References

Uniform electronic legal material act, see chapter 98.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next